Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska35-1402
Terms, defined.

For
purposes of the Volunteer Emergency Responders Job Protection Act:

(1) Employee does not include a career firefighter or law enforcement
officer who is acting as a volunteer emergency responder;

(2) Employer means any person employing ten or more employees; and

(3) Volunteer emergency responder means:

(a) An individual who has been approved by a governing body in Nebraska
to serve any volunteer fire department or volunteer first-aid, rescue, ambulance,
or emergency squad, or volunteer fire company, association, or organization
serving any city, village, or rural or suburban fire protection district by
providing fire protection or emergency response services for the purpose of
protecting life, health, or property;

(b) An individual who is in good standing as a volunteer member of the
Nebraska Wing of the Civil Air Patrol, the civilian auxiliary of the United
States Air Force; or

(c) An individual who
is a member of a state emergency response team pursuant to the Emergency Management
Act.

Laws 2008, LB1096, § 12;

Laws 2010, LB934, § 1;

Laws 2012, LB1005, § 1.

Emergency Management Act, see section 81-829.36.